Rules/ruu.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot
<17.loc>:ku[17]
<18.loc>:mu[18]
<23.loc>:e[23]
<agenda>:agenda[9a,10a,naug]
<archive>:akaivu[9a,10a,naug]
<bank_account>:akawunti[9a,10a,naug]
<morning_star>:alifagili[9a,naug]
<algebra>:alijebula[1a,mass,naug]
<remand>:alimanda[9a,naug]
<report>:alipoota[9a,naug]
<Allah>:allah[1a,naug]
<stomach_ulcer>:alusa[1a,10,naug]
<ambulance>:ambyulensi[9a,10a,naug]
<acid>:asidi[1a,mass,naug]
<atlas>:atalaasi[9a,10a,naug]
<Bunyala_royal_drum_beaten_to_signal_encouragement>:ataligadaaligada[1a,naug]
<disabled_person>:ateesobola[1a,2,naug]
<God>:atenganika[1a,naug]
<ice_cream>:ayisikuliimu[1a,mass,naug]
<elder_sibling>:baaba[1a,2]
<pot_used_for_drinking_millet_brew>:baalikyatula[9a,10a]
<hurricane>:babilumilaki[1a,mass]
<name_given_to_a_child_whose_mother_is_not_liked_by_the_husbands_family>:bagonza[1a,mass]
<name_given_to_a_child_who_is_born_when_parents_have_conflicts_with_neighbours>:bandumba[1a,mass]
<name_given_to_a_child_whose_father_is_not_known>:balwenda[1a,mass]
<name_given_to_a_child_who_is_born_when_his_or_her_parents_are_wrongly_accused>:batumbya[1a,mass]
<bar>:bbaala[9a,10a]
<envelope>:bbaasa[9a,10a]
<bus>:bbaasi[9a,10a]
<waistcoat>:bbaasikooti[1a,10]
<battery>:bbaatule[9a,10a]
<angle_line>:bbaawolayini[9a,10a]
<Bible>:bbaibbuli[9a,10a]
<pen>:bbailo[9a,10a]
<bra>:bbaka[9a,10a]
<bowl>:bbakuli[9a,10a]
<ice>:bbalaafu[1a,10]
<bra>:bbalawuuzi[9a,10a]
<Monday>:bbalaza[9a]
<light_bulb>:bbalubbu[9a,10a]
<balloon>:bbaluuni[9a,10a]
<letter>:bbaluwa[9a,10a]
<bumper>:bbampa[9a,10a]
<bandage>:bbandeegi[9a,10a]
<musical_band>:bbandi[9a,10a]
<maize_paste>:bbando[1a,10]
<bank>:bbanka[9a,10a]
<nursery_bed>:bbeedi[9a,10a]
<cost>:bbeeyi[9a,10a]
<flag>:bbendela[9a,10a]
<basin>:bbensani[9a,10a]
<kettle>:bbinika[9a,10a]
<plumb_bob>:bbiligi[9a,10a]
<biscuit>:bbisikwiti[1a,mass]
<beer>:bbiya[1a,mass]
<trade>:bbizineesi[9a,10a]
<box>:bbokisi[9a,10a]
<bomb>:bbomu[9a,10a]
<yoghurt>:bbongo[1a,mass]
<gomesi>:bboodingi[9a,10a]
<meat_vendor>:bbuca[9a,10a]
<brush>:bbulaasi[9a,10a]
<blanket>:bbulangiti[9a,10a]
<blouse>:bbulawuzi[9a,10a]
<brigadier>:bbuligediya[1a,2]
<timber>:bbuliti[9a,10a]
<brick>:bbulooka[9a,10a]
<blue>:bbululu[1a,mass]
<blue_powder>:bbululu[9a,10a]
<pump_sprayer>:bbumba[9a,10a]
<alcoholic_beverage_made_from_cassava_and_sorghum>:bbungu[1a,mass]
<trunk>:bbuutu[9a,10a]
<fox>:bbwa[1a,10]
<parish_priest>:bbwanamukulu[1a,2]
<ore>:bango[8,mass]
<syphilis>:bbalu[8,mass]
<leprosy>:bembe[8,mass]
<neck_part>:ca[8,mass]
<saliva>:cwantai[8,mass]
<food_stuck_on_the_sides_of_a_cooking_pan>:dede[8,mass]
<skin_sores>:dengu[8,mass]
<poor_quality_beer>:dombodo[8,mass]
<leftovers>:fuka[8,mass]
<banana_finger_stuffed_into_a_persons_anus_as_punishment>:gada[8,mass]
<overnight_leftovers_with_slime>:gagu[8,mass]
<vaseline>:gita[8,mass]
<brucellosis>:goye[8,mass]
<disaster_preparadness>:gwabitalagile[8,mass]
<beach>:biici[9a,10a]
<Virgin_Mary>:biikilamaliya[1a]
<diluted_sauce>:jaaluuke[8,mass]
<elephantiasis>:jeju[8,mass]
<acne>:jombo[8,mass]
<person_infested_with_jiggers>:bijunzai[1a,2]
<burnton_or_lefton_food_on_cooking_utensils>:kakamu[8,mass]
<inside_out>:kukuju[8,mass]
<mucus>:mila[8,mass]
<eye_discharge>:neni[8,mass]
<food_without_sauce>:nyaata[8,mass]
<mud>:nyangata[8,mass]
<curry_powder>:nzaali[8,mass]
<strabismus>:lali[8,mass]
<adopted_family_member>:bileetwa[1a,2]
<tears>:ligaliga[8,mass]
<ancestral_home>:ligo[8,mass]
<time>:lo[8,mass]
<generation>:lo[8,mass]
<mixed_sauce>:lungile[8,mass]
<labour_pains>:sa[8,mass]
<mud>:saabo[8,mass]
<type_of_food_leftovers>:saasaala[8,mass]
<name_given_to_a_beloved_child>:bisabyele[1a,mass]
<one_of_the_Kings_houses_in_the_palace>:bisabyele[1a,mass]
<bride_price>:salo[8,mass]
<fine_paid_for_impregnating_a_girl_before_marriage>:salo[8,mass]
<fees>:salo[8,mass]
<ringworm>:sente[8,mass]
<homosexuality>:siyaga[8,mass]
<syphilis>:sooni[8,mass]
<banana_sponge>:suumwa[8,mass]
<dung>:syai[8,mass]
<leftovers>:taaguju[8,mass]
<bowlegged>:tege[8,mass]
<toothless_gum>:teleenyi[8,mass]
<drool>:zagaamiilo[8,mass]
<lisp>:zobo[8,mass]
<poorly_ground>:zyegi[8,mass]
<bodaboda>:boodabooda[9a,10a]
<freedom_of_speech>:bazilo[14,mass]
<captivity>:bbwe[14,mass]
<lie>:beyegi[14,mass]
<refuge>:budamu[14,mass]
<origin>:byale[14,mass]
<innate_feature>:byale[14,mass]
<tradition>:byalilanwa[14,mass]
<place_of_birth>:byalo[14,mass]
<daily_happening>:canagandi[14,mass]
<name_given_to_a_child_born_when_there_is_a_special_happening_in_a_family>:canagandi[14,mass]
<peace>:culeeli[14,mass]
<liberation>:cungule[14,mass]
<taste>:cuunyi[14,mass]
<poison>:cwa[14,mass]
<meanness>:diilu[14,mass]
<silliness>:doma[14,mass]
<leakage>:domoki[14,mass]
<smallness>:dooli[14,mass]
<Buruuli_land>:duuli[14]
<rule>:fugi[14,mass]
<coldness>:fuki[14,mass]
<winter>:fuki[14,mass]
<marriage>:fumbo[14,mass]
<spear_grass>:fumbo[14,mass]
<herbal_or_traditional_healing_profession>:fumu[14,mass]
<summary>:fundi[14,mass]
<silverfish>:fulu[14,mass]
<slime>:gagi[14,mass]
<wealth>:gaiga[14,mass]
<sum>:gaite[14,mass]
<holy_matrimony>:gaite[14,mass]
<mixture>:gaitiki[14,mass]
<joinery>:gaitilo[14,mass]
<Buganda_kingdom>:ganda[14]
<gunpowder>:ganga[14,mass]
<drunkenness>:gangali[14,mass]
<forgiveness>:ganyile[14,mass]
<mercy>:ganyizi[14,mass]
<beer_brought_when_collecting_the_bride>:ganyulo[14,mass]
<reward>:ganyulo[14,mass]
<love>:ganzi[14,mass]
<leisure>:galaali[14,mass]
<laziness>:galai[14,mass]
<sloppiness>:galambi[14,mass]
<laziness>:gayaavu[14,mass]
<visit>:genyi[14,mass]
<meal>:genyi[14,mass]
<party>:genyi[14,mass]
<treachery>:gobya[14,mass]
<untrustworthiness>:gobya[14,mass]
<wedding>:gole[14,mass]
<snuff_which_is_sniffed_or_inhaled>:golo[14,mass]
<Solanum_aethiopicum>:golola[14]
<blackandwhite_spotted_cow>:gondo[14,mass]
<eastern_wind>:gondo[14,mass]
<obedience>:gondu[14,mass]
<anger>:gongeli[14,mass]
<tooth_marks>:gugune[14,mass]
<transaction>:guli[14,mass]
<shegoat_or_hen_that_has_produced_offsprings>:buguma[1a,10]
<patience>:guminkiliza[14,mass]
<strength>:gumu[14,mass]
<boldness>:gumu[14,mass]
<wealth>:guuda[14,mass]
<stupidity>:gwagwa[14,mass]
<flatness>:gwagwani[14,mass]
<calmness>:gwagwani[14,mass]
<west>:gwaisana[14,mass]
<deputyship>:gwela[14,mass]
<inheritance>:gwete[14,mass]
<succession>:gwetwa[14,mass]
<treatment>:janjabi[14,mass]
<insubordination>:jeemu[14,mass]
<softness>:jelebeli[14,mass]
<accusation>:junaane[14,mass]
<responsibility>:junaanizibwa[14,mass]
<accusation>:junaanwa[14,mass]
<oppression>:june[14,mass]
<help>:juni[14,mass]
<salvation>:juni[14,mass]
<salvation>:junwa[14,mass]
<drizzle>:jula[14,mass]
<testimony>:juulwa[14,mass]
<evidence>:juulwa[14,mass]
<being_a_Godparent>:juulwa[14,mass]
<old_age>:kaile[14,mass]
<proof>:kakafu[14,mass]
<power>:kakati[14,mass]
<firmness>:kakati[14,mass]
<proof>:kakati[14,mass]
<duress>:kake[14,mass]
<vagina>:kali[14,mass]
<power>:kama[14,mass]
<guidance>:kama[14,mass]
<kingdom>:kama[14,mass]
<tiredness>:kelwa[14,mass]
<width>:kiika[14,mass]
<mass>:kiiki[14,mass]
<supremacy>:kiikikiiki[14,mass]
<top_hardened_layer_of_food_not_suitable_for_eating>:kiiniiko[14,mass]
<opposite_side>:kila[14,mass]
<inlaws_home>:koi[14,mass]
<nervous_disorder>:koi[14,mass]
<Euphorbia_tirucalli>:koni[14]
<wheel_handle>:kono[14,mass]
<eyelashes>:kowe[14,mass]
<skills>:kugu[14,mass]
<old_age>:kulu[14,mass]
<hygiene>:kuni[14,mass]
<fraud>:kupya[14,mass]
<treachery>:kulupya[14,mass]
<security>:kuumi[14,mass]
<place_of_upbringing>:kuulo[14,mass]
<news>:kwenda[14,mass]
<leadership>:kwenda[14,mass]
<paleness>:kwenyi[14,mass]
<fadedness>:kwenyi[14,mass]
<firewood>:kwi[14,mass]
<dirt>:kyafu[14,mass]
<female_private_parts>:kyala[14,mass]
<womanhood>:kyala[14,mass]
<will>:laame[14,mass]
<Europe>:laaya[14]
<height>:lai[14,mass]
<prophecy>:langi[14,mass]
<hiked_price>:leegi[14,mass]
<mould>:lembo[14,mass]
<latex>:lembo[14,mass]
<heaviness>:lemeeli[14,mass]
<trouble>:lemeezi[14,mass]
<rule>:lemi[14,mass]
<trouble>:lemu[14,mass]
<handicap>:lemu[14,mass]
<defence>:libbiki[14,mass]
<surname>:ligilanwa[14,mass]
<name_given_to_child_whose_mother_uses_the_child_as_a_bait_to_get_riches>:buliilo[1a,mass]
<animal_husbundary>:liisya[14,mass]
<slime>:limbo[14,mass]
<sleep>:lo[14,mass]
<sorcery>:logo[14,mass]
<danger>:lookoole[14,mass]
<depth>:luba[14,mass]
<tartness>:lulu[14,mass]
<anger>:lulu[14,mass]
<farming>:lumi[14,mass]
<pain>:lumi[14,mass]
<rash>:lundu[14,mass]
<poison>:lungile[14,mass]
<venom>:lungu[14,mass]
<malady>:lwaile[14,mass]
<deceit>:lyaka[14,mass]
<type_of_grass_used_for_making_mats_and_roofs>:lyanyana[14,mass]
<south>:lyo[14,mass]
<wisdom>:lyo[14,mass]
<completion>:mali[14,mass]
<courage>:maliili[14,mass]
<longevity>:mamaali[14,mass]
<fame>:manye[14,mass]
<experience>:manyi[14,mass]
<experience>:manyilivu[14,mass]
<bravery>:manzi[14,mass,naug]
<crowding>:migiilye[14,mass]
<left>:moso[14,mass]
<shortness>:mpimpini[14,mass]
<disobedience>:mpuulo[14,mass]
<stupidity>:mpwise[14,mass]
<unity>:mwei[14,mass]
<prophecy>:nabbi[14,mass]
<weakness>:naki[14,mass]
<fame>:ncumecume[14,mass]
<archaic>:ncuukile[14,mass]
<tooth_marks>:nenenene[14,mass]
<England>:ngeleza[14]
<ladder>:niinilo[14,mass]
<worry>:nkenke[14,mass]
<worry>:nsuswe[14,mass]
<humanity>:ntu[14,mass]
<sweetness>:nuli[14,mass]
<sweetness>:nuliili[14,mass]
<semisweetness>:nulinuli[14,mass]
<slavery>:nyage[14,mass]
<exile>:nyage[14,mass]
<theft>:nyagi[14,mass]
<theft>:nyakuli[14,mass]
<Bunyala_kingdom>:nyala[14]
<smartness>:nyilili[14,mass]
<contempt>:nyoomi[14,mass]
<Bunyoro_Kingdom>:nyolo[14]
<hot_ash>:nyota[14,mass]
<relief>:nywelo[14,mass]
<paleness>:pelunki[14,mass]
<trachoma>:langulwa[14,mass]
<dirt>:lofu[14,mass]
<subcounty>:luguza[14,mass]
<risk>:lukuule[14,mass]
<venom>:lungu[14,mass]
<Buruuli_Kingdom>:luuli[14]
<archdeaconry>:saabadikoni[14,mass]
<swimming_pool>:saanyilo[14,mass]
<joy>:sagaluki[14,mass]
<support>:sagiki[14,mass]
<venom>:sagwa[14,mass]
<cow_dung>:sai[14,mass]
<beauty>:sai[14,mass]
<cow_dung>:sai[8,mass]
<penis>:saiza[14,mass]
<manhood>:saiza[14,mass]
<sap>:sando[14,mass]
<joy>:sanyuki[14,mass]
<trinity>:satu[14,mass]
<medicine>:sawu[14,mass]
<poverty>:seege[14,mass]
<straw>:seke[14,mass]
<joy>:semeeli[14,mass]
<living>:sengi[14,mass]
<millet_porridge>:sela[14,mass]
<cannibalism>:seli[14,mass]
<detainment>:sibe[14,mass]
<teenage_years>:sigazi[14,mass]
<deputyship>:sigile[14,mass]
<seeds>:sigo[14,mass]
<damage>:siisikali[14,mass]
<bad_manners>:siisikali[14,mass]
<colour_fading>:siiwunki[14,mass]
<adultery>:siiyani[14,mass]
<heritage>:sika[14,mass]
<freedom_of_speech>:simoolo[14,mass]
<Islam>:silaamu[14]
<disorder>:sile[14,mass]
<smell_of_a_burnt_food>:siliile[14,mass]
<quietness>:siliki[14,mass]
<silence>:silikiili[14,mass]
<stupidity>:silu[14,mass]
<sexual_immorality>:siyaani[14,mass]
<ability>:soboli[14,mass]
<worthiness>:soboloki[14,mass]
<Busoga_kingdom>:soga[14]
<education>:somesya[14,mass]
<pointedness>:songoli[14,mass]
<inlaws_home>:soni[14,mass]
<nudity>:soni[14,mass]
<meconium>:soosi[14,mass]
<group>:solooli[14,mass]
<discrimination>:solooli[14,mass]
<anger>:sungu[14,mass]
<trade>:suubuli[14,mass]
<trade>:suubuzi[14,mass]
<asthma>:suuka[14,mass]
<ground_rent>:suulu[14,mass]
<danger>:suume[14,mass]
<national_dress_of_Baganda_women>:busuuti[9a,10a]
<fury>:swandi[14,mass]
<crumbs>:swankuloswankulo[14,mass]
<dowry>:swele[14,mass]
<millet_flour>:sye[14,mass]
<millet_porridge>:syela[14,mass]
<high_cost>:syele[14,mass]
<face>:syo[14,mass]
<night_dancing>:syoli[14,mass]
<very_difficult_night>:taakye[14,mass]
<exile>:taaluke[14,mass]
<roaming>:taaluki[14,mass]
<insecurity>:tabanguki[14,mass]
<heat>:tagati[14,mass]
<disagreement>:tagilabumwei[14,mass]
<clans_headquarter>:taka[14,mass]
<need>:taki[14,mass]
<love>:taki[14,mass]
<rust>:talagi[14,mass]
<disunity>:talibumwe[14,mass]
<space_under_a_bed>:talike[14,mass]
<nonsense>:talumu[14,mass]
<ignorance>:tamanya[14,mass]
<adultery>:tambuli[14,mass]
<location>:tambuulo[14,mass]
<insobriety>:tamiile[14,mass]
<mishap>:tandu[14,mass]
<mishap>:tandwa[14,mass]
<openness>:tangaaliili[14,mass]
<shock>:tangaaliili[14,mass]
<illiteracy>:tasoma[14,mass]
